District of Columbia statutes.
4-510

Emergency awards.

(a)

If it appears likely that a final award will be made and that the claimant will suffer undue financial or emotional hardship if immediate financial assistance is not granted, an emergency award not exceeding $1,000 may be made prior to the final determination.

(b)

If compensation is awarded, the Court shall deduct the amount of the emergency award from the final award.

(c)

If the emergency award is greater than the final award, the claimant shall repay the difference.

(d)

If compensation is not awarded, the claimant shall repay the emergency award to the Fund.

(e)

The District of Columbia may recover or institute a lien on outstanding funds. Any funds recovered shall be credited to the Fund.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 11, 44 DCR 1142

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-515.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-430.

Emergency Legislation

See note to § 4-501.